Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.080

Denial, suspension, revocation of license—Grounds—Hearing required.

The director is authorized to deny, suspend, or revoke the license provided for in RCW 15.30.020 subsequent to a hearing, in any case in which he or she finds that there has been a failure or refusal to comply with the provisions of this chapter or rules adopted hereunder.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6050; 1961 c 29 s 8.]